District of Columbia statutes.
22-4017

Freedom of Information Act exception.

Except for records made public according to the regulations promulgated by the Mayor pursuant to § 22-4011(g), no sex offender registration information shall be available as a public record under § 2-532.

July 11, 2000, D.C. Law 13-137, § 18, 47 DCR 797

History